Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2035
Applicant; examination; retaking examination.

Applicants for licensure in medicine and surgery and osteopathic medicine and surgery shall pass the licensing examination. An applicant who fails to pass any part of the licensing examination within four attempts shall complete one additional year of postgraduate medical education at an accredited school or college of medicine or osteopathic medicine. All parts of the licensing examination shall be successfully completed within ten years. An applicant who fails to successfully complete the licensing examination within the time allowed shall retake that part of the examination which was not completed within the time allowed.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 693.